Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Nonstock, Nonprofit Corporations
273.227.
Officers.

A corporation shall have the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one (1) or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

Each officer shall be elected or appointed at such time and in such manner and for such terms not exceeding three (3) years as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all officers shall be elected or appointed annually by the board of directors.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that any one (1) or more officers of the corporation shall be ex officio members of the board of directors.

Every officer of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as an officer, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 22; 1988, ch. 23, § 197, effective January 1, 1989; 2012, ch. 81, § 101, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 51, effective June 24, 2015.

273.228.
Authority of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 226, effective January 1, 1989.

273.229.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer of a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.387

, with discretionary authority, shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith;

On an informed basis; and

In a manner he honestly believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

Such officer shall be considered to discharge his duties on an informed basis if he makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the corporation, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.

In discharging his duties such officer shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer honestly believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

An officer shall not be considered to act in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted.

Any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action as an officer, shall not be the basis for monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:

The officer has breached or failed to perform his duties in compliance with this section; and

In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for human rights, safety or property.

A person bringing an action for monetary damages under this section shall have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of subsections (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach or failure to perform was the legal cause of the damages suffered.

Nothing in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of any officer for any act or omission occurring prior to July 15, 1988.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 14, effective July 15, 1988.

273.230.
Bylaws. [Repealed.]

273.231.
Removal of officers.

Any officer elected or appointed may be removed by the persons authorized to elect or appoint such officer whenever in their judgment the best interests of the corporation will be served thereby. The removal of an officer shall be without prejudice to the contract rights, if any, of the officer so removed. Election or appointment of an officer or agent shall not of itself create contract rights.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 23.

273.233.
Books and records.

Each corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members, board of directors and committees having any of the authority of the board of directors; and shall keep at its registered office or principal office in this state a record of the names and addresses of its members entitled to vote. All books and records of a corporation may be inspected and copied by any member, or the member’s agent or attorney, for any proper purpose at any reasonable time. The member’s right of inspection may be abolished or limited by the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 24; 2010, ch. 133, § 17, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 193, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

273.237.
Shares of stock and dividends prohibited — Permissible expenditures.

A corporation shall not have or issue shares of stock. Except as authorized by subsection (2) of this section, no dividend shall be paid and no part of the income or profit of a corporation shall be distributed to its members, directors, or officers.

A corporation may:

Pay reasonable compensation to its members, directors, or officers for services rendered to the corporation;

Reimburse reasonable expenses to its members, directors, or officers in connection with services rendered to the corporation;

Confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes;

Apply income or profit so as to reduce or eliminate dues, fees, or contributions that otherwise would be payable to the corporation by its members;

Make distributions, subject to subsection (3) of this section, upon dissolution or final liquidation to its members as permitted by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, and no such payment, benefit, or distribution shall be deemed to be a dividend or a distribution of income or profit;

Make distributions, subject to subsection (3) of this section, to any entity:

That is exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any successor section; or

That is a state, a possession of the United States, or any political subdivision of a state or a possession of the United States, or the United States or the District of Columbia, but only if the distribution under this subparagraph is made exclusively for public purposes; and

Make distributions, subject to subsection (3) of this section and only by a corporation other than a charitable or religious corporation to purchase its memberships.

A corporation shall not make any distribution under subsection (2)(e), (f), or (g) of this section if at the time of, or as a result of, the distribution:

The corporation would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The corporation’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 25; 2018 ch. 193, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

273.240.
Membership; rights of members. [Repealed.]

273.241.
Loans to directors and officers prohibited.

No loans shall be made by a corporation to its directors or officers. Any director or officer who assents to or participates in the making of any such loan shall be liable to the corporation for the amount of such loan until the repayment thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 26.

273.243.
Incorporators.

One (1) or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 27; 1976, ch. 27, § 3; 1988, ch. 23, § 198, effective January 1, 1989.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The validity of the articles of incorporation of a nonstock, nonprofit corporation formed by a group of teen-agers is not affected by the fact that some of the incorporators have not attained the age of 18, where some of the incorporators are in fact 18.

OAG 71-168

.

273.247.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

The name of the corporation that satisfies the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Any provisions, not inconsistent with law, which the incorporators elect to set forth in the articles of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the corporation, including any provision for distribution of assets or dissolution or final liquidation;

The corporation’s initial registered office and initial registered agent that satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

;

The mailing address of the corporation’s principal office;

The number of directors constituting the initial board of directors, and the names and mailing addresses of the persons who are to serve as the initial directors; and

The name and mailing address of each incorporator.

It shall not be necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation any of the corporate powers enumerated in KRS

273.163

to

273.387

.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation shall be presumed to have perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide that a change in the number of directors shall be made only by amendment to the articles of incorporation, a change in the number of directors made by amendment to the bylaws shall be controlling. In all other cases, when a provision of the articles of incorporation is inconsistent with a bylaw, the provision of the articles of incorporation shall be controlling.

Unless the registered agent signs the articles, the corporation shall deliver with the articles of incorporation the registered agent’s written consent to the appointment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 28; 1986, ch. 202, § 8, effective March 28, 1986; 1988, ch. 23, § 199, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 151, § 63, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

An amendment to this section was included in 1976 H.B. 26 (ch. 27) as originally introduced. The amended language, however, was deleted by floor amendment, but the section was not deleted from the act.

273.248.
Articles of incorporation — Limitation of director liability.

The articles of incorporation of a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.387

may set forth:

A provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation for monetary damages for breach of his duties as a director, provided that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any transaction in which the director’s personal financial interest is in conflict with the financial interests of the corporation;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or are known to the director to be a violation of law; or

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit.

No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of any director for any act or omissions occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective. In no case shall this subsection or any such provision be construed to expand the liability of any director as determined pursuant to KRS

273.215

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 11, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Lawyers Serving as Directors of Kentucky Nonprofit Corporations: Special Considerations, Vol. 69, No. 5, Sept. 2005, Ky. Bench & Bar 21.

273.250.
Members not liable for debts. [Repealed.]

273.251.
Filing of articles — Certificate of incorporation. [Repealed.]

273.252.
Filing requirements.

Each document delivered by a domestic or foreign corporation to the Secretary of State for filing shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
210, effective January 1, 1989; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 64, effective January 1, 2011.

273.2521.
Forms. [Repealed.]

273.2522.
Effective time and date of document. [Repealed.]

273.2523.
Correcting filed document. [Repealed.]

273.2524.
Filing duty of Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

273.2525.
Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document. [Repealed.]

273.2526.
Evidentiary effect of filed document. [Repealed.]

273.2527.
Certificate of existence. [Repealed.]

273.2528.
Penalty for signing false document. [Repealed.]

273.253.
Incorporation.

Upon the filing of articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, the corporate existence shall begin, and such filing shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the corporation has been incorporated under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 30; 1988, ch. 23, § 200, effective January 1, 1989.

273.2531.
Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence shall begin when the articles of incorporation are filed with the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of incorporation shall be conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation, except in proceedings by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 227, effective January 1, 1989.

273.257.
Organization of corporation.

After the filing of articles of incorporation, an organization meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation shall be held, either within or without this state, at the call of a majority of the incorporators, for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting. The incorporators calling the meeting shall give at least three (3) days’ notice thereof by mail to each director so named, which notice shall state the time and place of the meeting.

A first meeting of the members may be held at the call of the directors, or a majority of them, upon at least three (3) days’ notice, for such purposes as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 31; 1988, ch. 23, § 201, effective January 1, 1989.

273.260.
Amendment of articles. [Repealed.]

273.261.
Right to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, from time to time, in any and as many respects as may be desired, so long as its articles of incorporation as amended contain only such provisions as are lawful under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 32.

273.263.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected thereby shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at least two thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Any number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one (1) meeting.

Proposed amendments may be incorporated into restated articles of incorporation which contain a statement that except for the designated amendment the restated articles of incorporation currently set forth, without change, the corresponding provisions of the articles of incorporation as theretofore amended, and that the restated articles of incorporation together with the designated amendment supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 33; 1980, ch. 294, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.

273.267.
Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment that satisfy KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

setting forth:

The name of the corporation.

The amendment so adopted.

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, (a) a statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the amendment was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such amendment received at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or (b) a statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote with respect thereto.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the amendment was adopted, and a statement of the fact that such amendment received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 34; 1988, ch. 23, § 202, effective January 1, 1989; 2010, ch. 151, § 65, effective January 1, 2011.

273.270.
Process agent. [Repealed.]

273.271.
Recording of articles of amendment — Certificate of amendment. [Repealed.]

273.273.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A domestic corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as theretofore amended, in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed restated articles of incorporation and directing that they be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

Written notice setting forth the proposed restated articles or a summary of the provisions thereof shall be given to each member entitled to vote thereon, within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. If the meeting be an annual meeting, the proposed restated articles or a summary of the provisions thereof may be included in the notice of such annual meeting.

At such meeting a vote of the members entitled to vote thereon shall be taken on the proposed restated articles, which shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members entitled to vote thereon present at such meeting or represented by proxy.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, the proposed restated articles shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon such approval, restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation.

The purpose or purposes which the corporation is authorized to pursue.

Any other provisions, not inconsistent with law, which are then set forth in the articles of incorporation as theretofore amended, except that it shall not be necessary to set forth in the restated articles of incorporation the registered office of the corporation, its registered agent, its directors or its incorporators.

The restated articles of incorporation shall state that they correctly set forth the provisions of the articles of incorporation as theretofore amended, that they have been duly adopted as required by law and that they supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 36; 1976, ch. 27, § 10; 1978, ch. 384, § 451, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 23, § 203, effective January 1, 1989.

273.277.
Procedure for merger.

Any two (2) or more domestic corporations or a domestic corporation and a limited liability company may merge into one (1) of such corporations pursuant to a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

. Each corporation or limited liability company shall adopt a plan of merger setting forth:

The names of the corporations or limited liability companies proposing to merge, and the name of the corporation into which they propose to merge, which is hereinafter designated as the surviving corporation.

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger.

A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation to be effected by such merger.

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 37; 2019 ch. 131, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

273.280.
Dissolution. [Repealed.]

273.281.
Procedure for consolidation.

Any two (2) or more domestic corporations may consolidate into a new corporation pursuant to a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

. Each corporation shall adopt a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the corporations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new corporation into which they propose to consolidate, which is hereinafter designated as the new corporation.

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation.

With respect to the new corporation, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for corporations organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed consolidation as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 38.

273.283.
Approval of merger or consolidation.

A plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the following manner:

If the members of any merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors of such corporation shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed plan and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan or a summary thereof shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at each such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If any merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of such corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

After such approval, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 39.

273.287.
Articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon such approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

If the members of any merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote thereon, then as to each such corporation:

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such plan received at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

A statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote with respect thereto; and

If any merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, then as to each such corporation a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was adopted and a statement of the fact that such plan received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 40; 1976, ch. 27, § 11; 1978, ch. 384, § 452, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 23, § 204, effective January 1, 1989.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The mere fact that some of the incorporators of a nonstock, nonprofit corporation have not attained the age of 18 does not affect the validity of the articles of incorporation.

OAG 71-168

.

273.290.
Existing corporations subject to this law; exceptions. [Repealed.]

273.291.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

When a merger or consolidation has been effected:

The several corporations parties to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single corporation, which, in the case of a merger, shall be that corporation designated in the plan of merger as the surviving corporation, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation.

The separate existence of all corporations parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new corporation, shall cease.

Such surviving or new corporation shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

Such surviving or new corporation shall thereupon and thereafter possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, as well of a public as of a private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating corporations; and all property, real, personal and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the corporations so merged or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such single corporation without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, vested in any of such corporations shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of such merger or consolidation.

Such surviving or new corporation shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the corporations so merged or consolidated; and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such corporations may be prosecuted as if such merger or consolidation had not taken place, or such surviving or new corporation may be substituted in its place. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any such corporation shall be impaired by such merger or consolidation.

In the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger; and, in the case of a consolidation, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and which are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 41; 1988, ch. 23, § 205, effective January 1, 1989.

273.293.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporations and limited liability companies.

One (1) or more domestic corporations, a domestic corporation and a domestic limited liability company, and one (1) or more foreign corporations of the type that may be organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

or KRS Chapter 275 may be merged into one (1) of such domestic corporations, or consolidated into a new corporation to be formed under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, provided that the foreign corporation or corporations are authorized by the laws of the government under which they were formed to effect such merger or consolidation. Each domestic corporation or limited liability company shall comply with the provisions of KRS 273.161 to 273.390 with respect to the merger or consolidation, as the case may be, of domestic corporations, limited liability companies and each foreign corporation shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized and of this state.

After approval by the members, or if there be no members entitled to vote thereon, by the board of directors, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 42; 2019 ch. 131, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

273.297.
Sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, or pledge of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of all, or substantially all, property and assets of a corporation may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting, written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the manner provided by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation therefor. Such authorization shall require at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast. After such authorization by a vote of members, the board of directors, nevertheless, in its discretion, may abandon such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of assets, subject to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating thereto, without further action or approval by members.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation shall be authorized upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 43.

273.300.
Voluntary dissolution.

A corporation may dissolve and wind up its affairs in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the corporation be dissolved, and directing that the question of such dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the advisability of dissolving the corporation, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to dissolve the corporation shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, the dissolution of the corporation shall be authorized at a meeting of the board of directors upon the adoption of a resolution to dissolve by the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of such resolution by the members, or by the board of directors if there are no members or no members entitled to vote thereon, the corporation shall cease to conduct its affairs except insofar as may be necessary for the winding up thereof, shall immediately cause a notice of the proposed dissolution to be mailed to each known creditor of the corporation, and shall proceed to collect its assets and apply and distribute them as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 44.

273.302.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation shall continue its corporate existence but shall not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties in accordance with KRS

273.303

;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities including, as appropriate, entering into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction thereof; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation shall not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or members; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution;

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation;

Alter the obligations and responsibilities of the corporation as prescribed by applicable federal or state law with regard to the filing or examination of all federal and state tax returns or the payment, assessment, or collection of any federal or state tax due with respect to those returns; or

Abate or suspend KRS 273.187(2).

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 73, effective June 24, 2015.

273.303.
Distribution of assets.

The assets of a corporation in the process of dissolution shall be applied and distributed as follows:

All liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid and discharged, or adequate provisions shall be made therefor;

Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred or conveyed in accordance with such requirements;

Assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of the dissolution, shall be transferred or conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations, societies, or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation, pursuant to a plan of distribution adopted as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

;

Other assets, if any, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive rights of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others;

Any remaining assets may be distributed to such nonprofit societies, organizations or domestic or foreign corporations, as may be specified in a plan of distribution adopted as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 45; 1974, ch. 156, § 1.

273.307.
Plan of distribution.

A plan providing for the distribution of assets, not inconsistent with the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, may be adopted by a corporation in the process of dissolution and shall be adopted by a corporation for the purpose of authorizing any transfer or conveyance of assets for which KRS

273.161

to

273.390

requires a plan of distribution, in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a plan of distribution and directing the submission thereof to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan of distribution or a summary thereof shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. Such plan of distribution shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a plan of distribution shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving a vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 46.